Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1157
Trial; use of verdict; records; not required.

Summary jury trials shall not result in a final determination on the merits and shall not be appealable. Neither the fact of the holding of a summary jury trial nor the jurors' verdict nor the presentations by the parties shall be admissible as evidence in any subsequent trial of the action except any documents otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence. No record shall be required of the jury selection, the presentation of the parties, or the instructions by the court of the summary jury trial.

Laws 1987, LB 225, § 4.